California statutes. Penal Code
(6) A peace officer of the Department of Parks and Recreation, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 830.2.

(7) A peace officer, as defined in
 subdivision (d) of Section 830.31.

(8) A peace officer, as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 830.32.

(9) A peace officer, as defined in Section 830.5.

(10) A sworn member of the Department of Justice who is a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.1.

(11) A member of the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District Police Department, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 830.33.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 4.5) and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 872, Sec. 5.5.   (AB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative January 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18255.

(a) Upon taking custody of a firearm or other deadly weapon pursuant to this division, the officer shall give the owner or person who possessed the firearm or other deadly weapon a receipt.

(b) The receipt shall describe the firearm or other deadly weapon and list any identification or serial number on the firearm.

(c) The receipt shall indicate where the firearm or other deadly weapon can be recovered, the time limit for recovery as required by this division, and the date after which the owner or possessor can recover the firearm or other deadly weapon.

(d) The receipt shall include the name and residential mailing address of the owner
 or person who possessed the firearm or other deadly weapon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 185, Sec. 1.   (AB 2176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

18260.

Any peace officer, as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 830.32, who takes custody of a firearm or other deadly weapon pursuant to this division, shall deliver the firearm or other deadly weapon within 24 hours to the city police department or county sheriff’s office in the jurisdiction where the college or school is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 185, Sec. 2.   (AB 2176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

18265.

(a) No firearm or other deadly weapon taken into custody pursuant to this division shall be held less than 48 hours. 

(b) Except as provided in Section 18400, if a firearm or other deadly weapon is not retained for use as evidence related to criminal charges brought as a result of the domestic violence incident or is not retained because it was illegally possessed, the firearm or other deadly weapon shall be made available to the owner or person who was in lawful possession 48 hours after the seizure, or as soon thereafter as possible, but no later than five business days after the owner or person who was in lawful possession demonstrates compliance with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850)
 of Division 11 of Title 4. 

(c) In any civil action or proceeding for the return of any firearm, ammunition, or other deadly weapon seized by any state or local law enforcement agency and not returned within five business days after the initial seizure, except as provided in Section 18270, the court shall allow reasonable attorney’s fees to the prevailing party.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

18270.

If a firearm or other deadly weapon has been stolen and has been taken into custody pursuant to this division, it shall be restored to the lawful owner upon satisfaction of all of the following conditions: 

(a) Its use for evidence has been served. 

(b) The owner identifies the firearm or other deadly weapon and provides proof of ownership. 

(c) The law enforcement agency has complied with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850) of Division 11 of Title 4.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

18275.

(a) Any firearm or other deadly weapon that has been taken into custody and held by any of the following law enforcement authorities for longer than 12 months, and has not been recovered by the owner or person who had lawful possession at the time it was taken into custody, shall be considered a nuisance and destroyed as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 18005:

(1) A police, university police, or sheriff’s department.

(2) A marshal’s office.

(3) A peace officer of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 830.2.

(4) A peace officer of the Department of Parks and Recreation, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 830.2.

(5) A peace officer, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 830.31.

(6) A peace officer, as defined in Section 830.5.

(b) If a firearm or other deadly weapon is not recovered within 12 months due to an extended hearing process as provided in Section 18420,
 it is not subject to destruction until the court issues a decision, and then only if the court does not order the return of the firearm or other deadly weapon to the owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 58, Sec. 36.   (AB 200)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Procedure Where Agency Believes Return of Weapon Would Create Danger  [18400. - 18420.]

18400.

(a) When a law enforcement agency has reasonable cause to believe that the return of a firearm or other deadly weapon seized under this division would be likely to result in endangering the victim or the person who reported the assault or threat, the agency shall so advise the owner of the firearm or other deadly weapon, and within 60 days of the date of seizure, initiate a petition in superior court to determine if the firearm or other deadly weapon should be returned. 

(b) The law enforcement agency may make an ex parte application stating good cause for an order extending the time to file a petition. 

(c) Including any extension
 of time granted in response to an ex parte request, a petition must be filed within 90 days of the date of seizure of the firearm or other deadly weapon.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

18405.

(a) If a petition is filed under Section 18400, the law enforcement agency shall inform the owner or person who had lawful possession of the firearm or other deadly weapon, at that person’s last known address, by registered mail, return receipt requested, that the person has 30 days from the date of receipt of the notice to respond to the court clerk to confirm the person’s desire for a hearing, and that the failure to respond shall result in a default order forfeiting the confiscated firearm or other deadly weapon.

(b) For purposes of this section, the person’s last known address shall be presumed to be the address provided to the law enforcement officer by that person at the time of the domestic violence incident.

(c) In the event the person whose firearm or other deadly weapon was seized does not reside at the last address provided to the agency, the agency shall make a diligent, good faith effort to learn the whereabouts of the person and to comply with these notification requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 185, Sec. 3.   (AB 2176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

18410.

(a) If the person who receives a petition under Section 18405 requests a hearing, the court clerk shall set a hearing no later than 30 days from receipt of that request. 

(b) The court clerk shall notify the person, the law enforcement agency involved, and the district attorney of the date, time, and place of the hearing. 

(c) Unless it is shown by a preponderance of the evidence that the return of the firearm or other deadly weapon would result in endangering the victim or the person reporting the assault or threat, the court shall order the return of the firearm or other deadly weapon and shall award reasonable attorney’s fees to
 the prevailing party.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.

If the person who receives a petition under Section 18405 does not request a hearing or does not otherwise respond within 30 days of the receipt of the notice, the law enforcement agency may file a petition for an order of default and may dispose of the firearm or other deadly weapon as provided in Sections 18000 and 18005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

18420.

(a) If, at a hearing under Section 18410, the court does not order the return of the firearm or other deadly weapon to the owner or person who had lawful possession, that person may petition the court for a second hearing within 12 months from the date of the initial hearing. 

(b) If there is a petition for a second hearing, unless it is shown by clear and convincing evidence that the return of the firearm or other deadly weapon would result in endangering the victim or the person reporting the assault or threat, the court shall order the return of the firearm or other deadly weapon and shall award reasonable attorney’s fees to the prevailing party. 

(c) If the owner or person who had lawful possession does not petition the court within this 12-month period for a second hearing or is unsuccessful at the second hearing in gaining return of the firearm or other deadly weapon, the firearm or other deadly weapon may be disposed of as provided in Sections 18000 and 18005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Liability [18500. - 18500.]

18500.

The law enforcement agency, or the individual law enforcement officer, shall not be liable for any act in the good faith exercise of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 5. DESTRUCTIVE DEVICES, EXPLOSIVES, AND SIMILAR WEAPONS [18710. - 19290.]



  CHAPTER 1. Destructive Devices and Explosives Generally  [18710. - 19000.]



  ARTICLE 1. Prohibited Acts  [18710. - 18780.]

18710.

(a) Except as provided by this chapter, any person, firm, or corporation who, within this state, possesses any destructive device, other than fixed ammunition of a caliber greater than .60 caliber, is guilty of a public offense. 

(b) A person, firm, or corporation who is convicted of an offense under subdivision (a) shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed one year, or in state prison, or by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both this fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

18715.

(a) Every person who recklessly or maliciously has in possession any destructive device or any explosive in any of the following places is guilty of a felony:

(1) On a public street or highway.

(2) In or near any theater, hall, school, college, church, hotel, or other public building.

(3) In or near any private habitation.

(4) In, on, or near any aircraft, railway passenger train, car, cable road, cable car, or vessel engaged in carrying passengers for hire.

(5) In,
 on, or near any other public place ordinarily passed by human beings.

(b) An offense under subdivision (a) is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for a period of two, four, or six years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 531.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Amending action operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.   Section operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

18720.

Every person who possesses any substance, material, or any combination of substances or materials, with the intent to make any destructive device or any explosive without first obtaining a valid permit to make that destructive device or explosive, is guilty of a felony, and is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 532.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Amending action operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.   Section operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

18725.

Every person who willfully does any of the following is guilty of a felony and is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, four, or six years:

(a) Carries any destructive device or any explosive on any vessel, aircraft, car, or other vehicle that transports passengers for hire.

(b) While on board any vessel, aircraft, car, or other vehicle that transports passengers for hire, places or carries any destructive device or any explosive in any hand baggage, roll, or other container.

(c) Places any destructive device or any explosive in any baggage that is later checked with any
 common carrier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 533.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Amending action operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.   Section operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

18730.

Except as provided by this chapter, any person, firm, or corporation who, within this state, sells, offers for sale, or knowingly transports any destructive device, other than fixed ammunition of a caliber greater than .60 caliber, is guilty of a felony and is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 534.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Amending action operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.   Section operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

18735.

(a) Except as provided by this chapter, any person, firm, or corporation who, within this state, sells, offers for sale, possesses or knowingly transports any fixed ammunition of a caliber greater than .60 caliber is guilty of a public offense.

(b) Upon conviction of an offense under subdivision (a), a person, firm, or corporation shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed six months or by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both this fine and imprisonment.

(c) A second or subsequent conviction shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed one year, or by imprisonment
 pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not to exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000), or by both this fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 535.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Amending action operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.   Section operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

18740.

Every person who possesses, explodes, ignites, or attempts to explode or ignite any destructive device or any explosive with intent to injure, intimidate, or terrify any person, or with intent to wrongfully injure or destroy any property, is guilty of a felony, and shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for a period of three, five, or seven years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 536.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Amending action operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.   Section operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

18745.

Every person who explodes, ignites, or attempts to explode or ignite any destructive device or any explosive with intent to commit murder is guilty of a felony, and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for life with the possibility of parole.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

18750.

Every person who willfully and maliciously explodes or ignites any destructive device or any explosive that causes bodily injury to any person is guilty of a felony, and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a period of five, seven, or nine years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

18755.

(a) Every person who willfully and maliciously explodes or ignites any destructive device or any explosive that causes the death of any person is guilty of a felony, and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for life without the possibility of parole. 

(b) Every person who willfully and maliciously explodes or ignites any destructive device or any explosive that causes mayhem or great bodily injury to any person is guilty of a felony, and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for life.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

18780.

A person convicted of a violation of this chapter shall not be granted probation, and the execution of the sentence imposed upon that person shall not be suspended by the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exemptions [18800. - 18800.]

18800.

(a) Nothing in this chapter prohibits the sale to, purchase by, or possession, transportation, storage, or use of, a destructive device or explosive by any of the following: 

(1) Any peace officer listed in Section 830.1 or 830.2, or any peace officer in the Department of Justice authorized by the Attorney General, while on duty and acting within the scope and course of employment. 

(2) Any member of the Army, Navy, Air Force, or Marine Corps of the United States, or the National Guard, while on duty and acting within the scope and course of employment. 

(b) Nothing
 in this chapter prohibits the sale to, or the purchase, possession, transportation, storage, or use by any person who is a regularly employed and paid officer, employee, or member of a fire department or fire protection or firefighting agency of the federal government, the State of California, a city, county, city and county, district, or other public or municipal corporation or political subdivision of this state, while on duty and acting within the scope and course of employment, of any equipment used by that department or agency in the course of fire suppression.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Permit and Inspection [18900. - 18910.]

18900.

(a) Every dealer, manufacturer, importer, and exporter of any destructive device, or any motion picture or television studio using destructive devices in the conduct of its business, shall obtain a permit for the conduct of that business from the Department of Justice. 

(b) Any person, firm, or corporation not mentioned in subdivision (a) shall obtain a permit from the Department of Justice in order to possess or transport any destructive device. No permit shall be issued to any person who meets any of the following criteria: 

(1) Has been convicted of any felony. 

(2) Is addicted to the use of any narcotic drug. 

(3) Is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm. 

(c) An application for a permit shall comply with all of the following: 

(1) It shall be filed in writing. 

(2) It shall be signed by the applicant if an individual, or by a member or officer qualified to sign if the applicant is a firm or corporation. 

(3) It shall state the name, business in which engaged, business address, and a full description of the use to which the destructive devices are to be put. 

(d) Applications and permits shall be uniform
 throughout the state on forms prescribed by the Department of Justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

18905.

(a) Each applicant for a permit under this article shall pay at the time of filing the application a fee not to exceed the application processing costs of the Department of Justice. 

(b) A permit granted under this article may be renewed one year from the date of issuance, and annually thereafter, upon the filing of a renewal application and the payment of a permit renewal fee not to exceed the application processing costs of the Department of Justice. 

(c) After the department establishes fees sufficient in amount to cover processing costs, the amount of the fees shall only increase at a rate not to exceed the legislatively
 approved cost-of-living adjustment for the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

18910.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the Department of Justice shall, for every person, firm, or corporation to whom a permit is issued under this article, annually conduct an inspection for security and safe storage purposes, and to reconcile the inventory of destructive devices. 

(b) A person, firm, or corporation with an inventory of fewer than five devices that require any Department of Justice permit shall be subject to an inspection for security and safe storage purposes, and to reconcile inventory, once every five years, or more frequently if determined by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Destructive Device Constituting Nuisance [19000. - 19000.]

19000.

(a) Possession of any destructive device in violation of this chapter is a public nuisance. 

(b) The Attorney General or district attorney of any city, county, or city and county may bring an action in the superior court to enjoin the possession of any destructive device. 

(c) Any destructive device found to be in violation of this chapter shall be surrendered to the Department of Justice, or to the sheriff or chief of police, if the sheriff or chief of police has elected to perform the services required by this section. The department, sheriff, or chief of police shall destroy the destructive device so as to render it unusable
 and unrepairable as a destructive device, except upon the filing of a certificate with the department by a judge or district attorney stating that the preservation of the destructive device is necessary to serve the ends of justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Explosive Substance Other Than Fixed Ammunition  [19100. - 19190.]

19100.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2, any person in this state who carries concealed upon the person any explosive substance, other than fixed ammunition, is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 84.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19190.

The unlawful concealed carrying upon the person of any explosive substance other than fixed ammunition, as provided in Section 19100, is a nuisance and is subject to Sections 18000 and 18005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Handgrenades [19200. - 19290.]

19200.

(a) Except as provided in Section 19205 and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2, any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, or possesses any metal military practice handgrenade or metal replica handgrenade is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a first offense involving any metal military practice handgrenade or metal replica handgrenade shall be punishable only as an infraction unless the offender is an active participant in a criminal street gang as defined
 in the Street Terrorism and Enforcement and Prevention Act (Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 186.20) of Title 7 of Part 1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 85.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19205.

Section 19200 does not apply to any plastic toy handgrenade, or any metal military practice handgrenade or metal replica handgrenade that is a relic, curio, memorabilia, or display item, that is filled with a permanent inert substance, or that is otherwise permanently altered in a manner that prevents ready modification for use as a grenade.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

19290.

Except as provided in Section 19205 and in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2, any metal military practice handgrenade or metal replica handgrenade is a nuisance and is subject to Section 18010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 6. LESS LETHAL WEAPONS [19400. - 19405.]

19400.

A person who is a peace officer or a custodial officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, may, if authorized by and under the terms and conditions as are specified by the person’s employing agency, purchase, possess, or transport any less lethal weapon or ammunition for any less lethal weapon, for official use in the discharge of the person’s duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

19405.

Any person who sells a less lethal weapon to a person under the age of 18 years is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for up to six months or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 3. WEAPONS AND DEVICES OTHER THAN FIREARMS [19910. - 23025.]



  DIVISION 1. BB DEVICES [19910. - 19915.]

19910.

Every person who sells any BB device to a minor is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

19915.

(a) Every person who furnishes any BB device to any minor, without the express or implied permission of a parent or legal guardian of the minor, is guilty of a misdemeanor. 

(b) As used in this section, “furnishes” means either of the following: 

(1) A loan. 

(2) A transfer that does not involve a sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 2. BLOWGUNS [20010. - 20015.]

20010.

Any person who knowingly manufactures, sells, offers for sale, possesses, or uses a blowgun or blowgun ammunition in this state is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

20015.

Nothing in this division shall prohibit the sale to, purchase by, possession of, or use of any blowgun or blowgun ammunition by zookeepers, animal control officers, Department of Fish and Game personnel, humane officers whose names are maintained in the county record of humane officers pursuant to Section 14502 of the Corporations Code, or veterinarians in the course and scope of their business in order to administer medicine to animals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 3. BOOBYTRAP [20110. - 20110.]

20110.

(a) Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 18710) of Division 5 of Title 2, any person who assembles, maintains, places, or causes to be placed a boobytrap device is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or five years.

(b) Possession of any device with the intent to use the device as a boobytrap is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 86.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 4. IMITATION FIREARMS [20150. - 20180.]

20150.

(a) Any person who changes, alters, removes, or obliterates any coloration or markings that are required by any applicable state or federal law or regulation, for any imitation firearm, or any device described in subdivision (b) of Section 16700, in a way that makes the imitation firearm or device look more like a firearm, is guilty of a misdemeanor. 

(b) This section does not apply to a manufacturer, importer, or distributor of imitation firearms. 

(c) This section does not apply to lawful use in theatrical productions, including motion pictures, television, and stage productions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

20155.

Any manufacturer, importer, or distributor of toy, look-alike, or imitation firearms that fails to comply with any applicable federal law or regulation governing the marking of a toy, look-alike, or imitation firearm, is guilty of a misdemeanor. The definition of “imitation firearm” specified in Section 16700 does not apply to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 185, Sec. 4.   (AB 2176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

20160.

(a) Any imitation firearm manufactured after July 1, 2005, shall, at the time of offer for sale in this state, be accompanied by a conspicuous advisory in writing as part of the packaging, but not necessarily affixed to the imitation firearm, to the effect that the product may be mistaken for a firearm by law enforcement officers or others, that altering the coloration or markings required by state or federal law or regulations so as to make the product look more like a firearm is dangerous, and may be a crime, and that brandishing or displaying the product in public may cause confusion and may be a crime. 

(b) Any manufacturer, importer, or distributor that fails to comply with this advisory for
 any imitation firearm manufactured after July 1, 2005, shall be liable for a civil fine for each action brought by a city attorney or district attorney of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the first action, five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the second action, and ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for the third action and each subsequent action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

20165.

(a) Any person who, for commercial purposes, purchases, sells, manufactures, ships, transports, distributes, or receives, by mail order or in any other manner, an imitation firearm, except as authorized by this section, is liable for a civil fine in an action brought by the city attorney or the district attorney of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation. 

(b) The manufacture, purchase, sale, shipping, transport, distribution, or receipt, by mail or in any other manner, of an imitation firearm is authorized if the device is manufactured, purchased, sold, shipped, transported, distributed, or received for any of the following purposes: 

(1) Solely for export in interstate or foreign commerce. 

(2) Solely for lawful use in theatrical productions, including motion picture, television, and stage productions. 

(3) For use in a certified or regulated sporting event or competition. 

(4) For use in military or civil defense activities, or ceremonial activities. 

(5) For public displays authorized by public or private schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

20170.

(a) No person may openly display or expose any imitation firearm in a public place. 

(b) As used in this section, “public place” means an area open to the public and includes any of the following: 

(1) A street. 

(2) A sidewalk. 

(3) A bridge. 

(4) An alley. 

(5) A plaza. 

(6) A park. 

(7) A driveway. 

(8) A front yard. 

(9) A parking lot. 

(10) An automobile, whether moving or not. 

(11) A building open to the general public, including one that serves food or drink, or provides entertainment. 

(12) A doorway or entrance to a building or dwelling. 

(13) A public school. 

(14) A public or private college or university.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

20175.

Section 20170 does not apply in any of the following circumstances: 

(a) The imitation firearm is packaged or concealed so that it is not subject to public viewing. 

(b) The imitation firearm is displayed or exposed in the course of commerce, including a commercial film or video production, or for service, repair, or restoration of the imitation firearm. 

(c) The imitation firearm is used in a theatrical production, a motion picture, video, television, or stage production. 

(d) The imitation firearm is used in conjunction with a
 certified or regulated sporting event or competition. 

(e) The imitation firearm is used in conjunction with lawful hunting, or a lawful pest control activity. 

(f) The imitation firearm is used or possessed at a certified or regulated public or private shooting range. 

(g) The imitation firearm is used at a fair, exhibition, exposition, or other similar activity for which a permit has been obtained from a local or state government. 

(h) The imitation firearm is used in a military, civil defense, or civic activity, including a flag ceremony, color guard, parade, award presentation, historical reenactment, or memorial. 

(i) The imitation firearm is used for a public display authorized by a
 public or private school or a display that is part of a museum collection. 

(j) The imitation firearm is used in a parade, ceremony, or other similar activity for which a permit has been obtained from a local or state government. 

(k) The imitation firearm is displayed on a wall plaque or in a presentation case. 

(l) The imitation firearm is used in an area where the discharge of a firearm is lawful. 

(m) The entire exterior surface of the imitation firearm is white, bright red, bright orange, bright yellow, bright green, bright blue, bright pink, or bright purple, either singly or as the predominant color in combination with other colors in any pattern, or the entire device is constructed of transparent or translucent material that permits unmistakable
 observation of the device’s complete contents. Merely having an orange tip as provided in federal law and regulations does not satisfy this requirement. The entire surface must be colored or transparent or translucent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

20180.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), violation of Section 20170 is an infraction punishable by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense, and three hundred dollars ($300) for a second offense. 

(b) A third or subsequent violation of Section 20170 is punishable as a misdemeanor. 

(c) Nothing in Section 20170, 20175, or this section shall be construed to preclude prosecution for a violation of Section 171b, 171.5, or 626.10.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 5. KNIVES AND SIMILAR WEAPONS [20200. - 21590.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [20200. - 20200.]

20200.

A knife carried in a sheath that is worn openly suspended from the waist of the wearer is not concealed within the meaning of Section 16140, 16340, 17350, or 21310.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Disguised or Misleading Appearance [20310. - 20990.]



  ARTICLE 1. Air Gauge Knife [20310. - 20390.]

20310.
